California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) The application contains significant false or misleading information or significant misrepresentations.

(e) The agency determines the applicant has, during the previous three years, been convicted of, or been issued a final order for, one or more violations of this division, or regulations adopted pursuant to this division, or the terms and conditions of the permit, and the violation meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The violation demonstrates a chronic recurring pattern of noncompliance that has posed, or may pose, a significant risk to public health and safety or to the environment.

(2) The violation has not been corrected or reasonable progress toward correction has not been achieved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suspension or Revocation [44305. - 44310.]

44305.

(a) An enforcement agency may, after holding a public hearing before a hearing panel or a hearing officer appointed pursuant to Section 44308 or 44309, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 44310, temporarily suspend a solid waste facilities permit if the enforcement agency determines that changed conditions at the facility necessitate a permit revision or modification to eliminate a significant threat to public health and safety or to the environment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the enforcement agency may suspend a solid waste facilities permit prior to holding a hearing if the enforcement agency determines that changed conditions at the facility necessitate a permit revision or modification to prevent or mitigate an imminent and substantial threat to the public health and safety or to the environment. However, any person aggrieved by an action by an enforcement agency to suspend a permit pursuant to this subdivision may appeal the action to a hearing panel or hearing officer appointed pursuant to Section 44308 or 44309. The hearing panel or hearing officer shall, at the request of the aggrieved party, hear the appeal within three business days of the date when the permit was suspended, or the first day thereafter requested by the aggrieved party in compliance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The hearing panel or hearing officer shall render its decision on the day the
 hearing concludes. The hearing panel or hearing officer may affirm, modify, or rescind the permit suspension. A decision of a hearing panel or hearing officer appointed pursuant to Section 44308 or 44309 may be appealed pursuant to Section 45030.

(c) The enforcement agency shall lift the permit suspension as soon as the changed conditions that necessitated the suspension pursuant to subdivision (b) have been corrected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44306.

The enforcement agency may, after holding a hearing in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 44310, revoke a solid waste facilities permit if the enforcement agency determines any of the following:

(a) The permit was obtained by a material misrepresentation or failure to disclose relevant factual information.

(b) The operator has, during the previous three years, been convicted of, or been issued a final order for, one
 or more violations of this division, regulations adopted pursuant to this division, or the terms and conditions of the permit, and the violation meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The violation demonstrates a chronic recurring pattern of noncompliance that has posed, or may pose, a significant risk to public health and safety or to the environment.

(2) The violation has not been corrected or reasonable progress toward correction has not been achieved.

(c) The operator has failed to pay in full any monetary penalty imposed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000) within 90 days from the date when the penalty is required to be paid and after the expiration of the time period during which the permitholder may appeal the ruling, or after the denial of the permitholder’s timely appeal up to, and
 including, an appeal to the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44307.

From the date of issuance of a permit that imposes conditions that are inappropriate, as contended by the applicant, or after the taking of any enforcement action pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000) by the enforcement agency, the enforcement agency shall hold a hearing, if requested to do so, by the person subject to the action. The enforcement agency shall also hold a hearing upon a petition to the enforcement
 agency from any person requesting the enforcement agency to review an alleged failure of the agency to act as required by this part, Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000), or Part 6 (commencing with Section 45030) or a regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this part, Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000), or Part 6 (commencing with Section 45030). A hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedures specified in Section 44310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 509, Sec. 6.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

44308.

(a) All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter by the enforcement agency shall be conducted by a hearing officer appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) or a hearing panel appointed pursuant to either of the following procedures:

(1) The governing body may appoint three of its members as the hearing panel.

(2) The chairperson of the governing body may appoint an independent hearing panel consisting of three
 members.

(b) (1) If an independent hearing panel is appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), not more than one member of the governing body shall serve on the hearing panel.

(2) Members of the independent hearing panel shall be selected for their legal, administrative, or technical abilities in areas relating to solid waste management.

(3) At least one member of the independent hearing panel shall be a technical expert with knowledge of solid waste management methods and technology.

(4) At least one member of the independent hearing panel shall be a representative of the public at large.

(5) A member of an independent hearing panel shall serve for a
 term of four years, and may not serve more than two consecutive terms.

(6) If a member of an independent hearing panel does not complete the member’s term, the chairperson of the governing body shall appoint a replacement to serve out the remainder of the unexpired term.

(c) Members of the hearing panel may receive per diem and necessary expenses while conducting the hearing.

(d) The governing body of an enforcement agency may appoint a hearing officer only if the governing body has adopted procedures for making that appointment and has adopted qualifications that the hearing officer is required to meet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44309.

All hearings conducted by the board acting as the enforcement agency pursuant to Section 43205 shall be conducted by a hearing panel of three board members appointed by the chairperson of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44310.

All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be based on the following procedures:

(a) (1) The hearing shall be initiated by the filing of a written request for a hearing with a statement of the issues.

(A) If the hearing request is made by the person subject to the action, the request shall be made within 15 days from the date that person is notified, in writing, of the enforcement agency’s intent to act
 in the manner specified.

(B) If the hearing request is made by a person alleging that the enforcement agency failed to act as required by law or regulation pursuant to Section 44307, the person shall file a request for a hearing within 30 days from the date the person discovered or reasonably should have discovered, the facts on which the allegation is based.

(2) The enforcement agency shall, within 15 days from the date of receipt of a request for a hearing, provide written notice to the person filing the request notifying the person of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

(3) If that person fails to request a hearing or to timely file a statement of issues, the enforcement agency may take the proposed action without a hearing or may, at its discretion, proceed with a hearing before taking the proposed
 action.

(4) The enforcement agency shall file its written response to the statement of issues filed by the person requesting the hearing with the hearing panel or the hearing officer, and provide a copy to the person requesting the hearing, not less than 15 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(b) The hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after receiving the request for a hearing on the merits of the issues presented, in accordance with the procedures specified in Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Within five days from the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing panel or hearing officer shall issue its decision. The decision shall become effective as provided in Section 45017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Asbestos Containing Waste [44820. - 44820.]

44820.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the board shall adopt, by regulation, a permitting, inspection, and enforcement program for the disposal of asbestos containing waste, as specified in Section 25143.7 of the Health and Safety Code, at a solid waste facility or disposal site subject to regulation pursuant to this part. The program may include, but is not limited to, standards and certification requirements for local enforcement agencies, pursuant to which the board may delegate authority for the regulation of asbestos containing waste to local enforcement agencies.

(b) On or before March 1, 1995, or the earliest feasible date thereafter, the board and the Department of Toxic
 Substances Control shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that defines the enforcement responsibilities of each agency for the disposal of asbestos containing waste at a solid waste disposal facility or disposal site subject to regulation pursuant to this part. The memorandum of understanding shall be periodically updated to be consistent with each agency’s responsibilities pursuant to this section and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Until the board has adopted regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall regulate asbestos containing waste at a solid waste facility or disposal site.

(d) Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be deemed emergency regulations and shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 266.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. ENFORCEMENT [45000. - 45025.]



  CHAPTER 1. Administrative Enforcement [45000. - 45024.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corrective Action Orders [45000. - 45003.]

45000.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the enforcement agency or the board may issue an administrative order requiring the owner or operator of a solid waste facility or disposal site or a person in violation of Section 44000.5, to take corrective action as necessary to abate a nuisance, or to protect human health and safety or the environment. If both the board and the enforcement agency issue an administrative order regarding the same facility, disposal site, or person, the order issued by the board shall prevail if there is a conflict between the orders.

(b) An administrative order shall not be issued for a minor violation that is corrected immediately in the presence of the inspector. Immediate compliance in that manner shall be noted in the inspection report.

(c) The enforcement agency or the board may contract for corrective action after an order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) becomes final and the owner or operator fails to comply with the order by the date specified in the order.

(d) If an enforcement agency or the board expends any funds pursuant to subdivision (b), the owner or operator of the solid waste facility or disposal site or a person in violation of Section 44000.5 shall reimburse the enforcement agency or the board for the amount expended, including, but not limited to, a reasonable amount for contract administration, and an amount equal to the interest that would have been earned on the expended funds. The amount expended shall be recoverable in a civil action by the Attorney General, upon request of the local enforcement agency or the board.

(e) A contract for corrective action entered into by the board is exempt from approval by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(f) A corrective action shall incorporate by reference applicable waste discharge requirements issued by the state water board or a regional water board, and shall be consistent with all applicable water quality control plans adopted pursuant to Section 13170 of, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 13240) of Chapter 4 of Division 7 of, the Water Code, and state policies for water quality control adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 of the Water Code, existing at the time of the corrective action or proposed corrective action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45001.

Nothing in this division affects the authority of the state water board or a regional water board to issue enforcement orders or take corrective actions with regard to solid waste facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 34.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45002.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an order issued pursuant to this part or Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) shall provide the person subject to that order with a notice of that person’s right to appeal pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) and Part 6 (commencing with Section 45030).

(b) The recipient of a notice to comply issued pursuant to Section 45003 may request that a hearing be conducted in accordance with Section 44307, but only with respect to an action taken by an enforcement agency of the board that arises from a minor violation that the owner or operator fails to correct or fails to certify, in a timely manner, as having been corrected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45003.

(a) (1) An authorized representative of the enforcement agency or board who, in the course of conducting an inspection, detects a minor violation, shall take an enforcement action as to the minor violation only in accordance with this section.

(2) In a proceeding concerning an enforcement action taken pursuant to this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption upholding the determination made by the enforcement agency or board regarding whether the violation is a minor violation.

(b) A notice to comply shall be the only means by which an enforcement agency or board may cite a minor violation, unless the person cited fails to correct the violation or fails to submit the certification of correction within the time period prescribed in the notice, in which case the enforcement agency or board may take any enforcement action, including imposing a penalty, as authorized by this part.

(c) (1) The enforcement agency or the board shall commence an enforcement action under this section by serving a notice to comply on the owner or operator of the solid waste facility or disposal site at which a violation has occurred, specifying the violation and the manner in which the violation may be corrected.

(2) A person who receives a notice to comply detailing a minor violation shall have not more than 30 days from the date of the notice to comply in which to correct any violation cited in the notice to comply. Within five working days of correcting the violation, the person cited or an authorized representative shall sign the notice to comply, certifying that any violation has been corrected, and return the notice to the enforcement agency or board, whichever issued the notice to comply.

(3) A false certification that a violation has been corrected is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(4) The effective date of the certification that a violation has been corrected shall be one of the following dates, whichever occurs first:

(A) The date the certification is received by the enforcement agency or the board, whichever issued the notice to comply, including receipt of an electronic or facsimile version of the certification.

(B) The date the certification is postmarked by the United States Postal Service.

(C) The date the certification is accepted for delivery by a national express delivery service as evidenced by a receipt.

(d) If a notice to comply is issued, a single notice to comply shall be issued for all minor violations noted during the inspection, and the notice to comply shall list all of the minor violations and the manner in which each of the minor violations may be brought into compliance.

(e) If a person who receives a notice to comply pursuant to subdivision (c) disagrees with one or more of the alleged violations listed on the notice to comply, the person shall provide the enforcement agency or board that issued the notice to comply a written notice of disagreement specifying the allegations with which the person disagrees along with the returned signed notice to comply, certifying that all of the undisputed violations have been corrected. If the person disagrees with all of the alleged violations, the written notice of disagreement shall be returned in lieu of the signed certification of correction within 30 days of the date of issuance of the notice to comply. If the issuing agency takes administrative enforcement action on the basis of the disputed violation, that action may be appealed in the same manner as any other alleged violation under Section 44307.

(f) This section does not do any of the following:

(1) Prevent a reinspection to ensure compliance with this division or to ensure that minor violations cited in a notice to comply have been corrected and that the solid waste facility or disposal site is in compliance with this division.

(2) Prevent the enforcement agency or board from requiring a person to submit necessary documentation needed to support the person’s claim of compliance pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) Restrict the power of a city attorney, district attorney, county counsel, or the Attorney General to bring, in the name of the people of California, any criminal proceeding otherwise authorized by law.

(4) Prevent the enforcement agency or board from cooperating with, or participating in, a proceeding specified in paragraph (3).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cease and Desist Orders [45005. - 45005.]

45005.

An enforcement agency or the board may issue a cease and desist order to any of the following:

(a) A person who is operating, has operated, or proposes to operate a solid waste facility or operates a disposal site in an unauthorized manner, or who is disposing of solid waste in any of the following manners:

(1) In violation of a solid waste facilities permit or in violation of this division, or any regulation adopted pursuant to this division.

(2) Without a solid waste facilities permit.

(3) In a manner that causes or threatens to cause a condition of hazard, pollution, or nuisance.

(b) A person who has violated, is violating, or proposes to violate Section 44000.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Civil Penalties [45010. - 45024.]

45010.

(a) The board and enforcement agencies shall impose civil penalties on the operators of solid waste facilities in a judicious manner and shall impose those penalties only after all reasonable efforts pursuant to Section 45010.2 have been made by enforcement agencies to provide proper notice of violations to alleged violators as well as a reasonable opportunity to bring solid waste facilities and disposal sites into compliance with this division.

(b) An enforcement agency shall not deposit funds collected through the imposition of civil penalties pursuant to this article in the General Fund of the local enforcement agency, but instead shall deposit those funds in a segregated account and use those funds exclusively for enhancing solid waste enforcement within the local enforcement agency’s jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Increasing enforcement programs.

(2) Expanding the agency’s enforcement capabilities.

(3) Bringing solid waste facilities into compliance with this division.

(4) Remediating illegal or abandoned solid waste disposal sites.

(c) Civil penalties paid to the board pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Enforcement Penalty Account, which is hereby established in the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund created pursuant to Section 48027. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 48027, the moneys in the Enforcement Penalty Account may be expended by the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to enforce and implement this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45010.1.

(a) The board or an enforcement agency may issue an order imposing a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, for each day that the violation continues, to a person who violates the terms or conditions of a solid waste facilities permit or who violates a requirement of this division, a regulation adopted pursuant to this division, or an order issued under this chapter, if the requirement, regulation, or order is applicable to a solid waste facility or a disposal site. An enforcement agency or the board may impose the penalty administratively pursuant to this part.

(b) In determining the amount of civil liability to be imposed pursuant to this section, the board or enforcement agency shall take into consideration the factors specified in Section 45016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45010.2.

Before the board or enforcement agency issues an order under this chapter, except for a notice to comply pursuant to Section 45003, the board or enforcement agency shall do both of the following:

(a) Notify the owner or operator of the solid waste facility or the owner or operator of the disposal site, that the facility or site is in violation of this division, a regulation adopted pursuant to this division, or an order issued under this division, applicable to a solid waste facility or disposal site.

(b) Upon the request of the owner or operator of the solid waste facility or the owner or operator of the disposal site, meet with the owner or operator to clarify the applicable requirements and to determine what actions, if any, that the operator or owner may voluntarily take to bring the facility or site into compliance by the earliest feasible date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45011.

If an enforcement agency or the board determines that a solid waste facility or disposal site is in violation of this division, a regulation adopted pursuant to this division, the terms or conditions of a solid waste facilities permit, an order issued under this division, or poses a potential or actual threat to public health and safety or the environment, or determines that a person has disposed of solid waste at an unpermitted disposal site in violation of Section 44000.5, the enforcement agency or board may issue an order establishing a time schedule according to which the facility or site shall be brought into compliance with this division. The order may also provide for a civil penalty, to be imposed administratively by the enforcement agency or board, in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day on which a violation occurs, if compliance is not achieved in accordance with that time schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45012.

(a) If an enforcement agency, despite having made a good faith effort pursuant to its enforcement authority or any other authority, is unable to correct a violation, and the board, acting through its executive director, and the enforcement agency both agree that enforcement by the board is feasible and desirable pursuant to these circumstances, the board, acting through its executive director, may take any appropriate enforcement action pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board shall not take any enforcement action specified in this part without providing notice to the enforcement agency and the violator of the board’s intent to take that action, allowing the enforcement agency and the violator a reasonable opportunity to correct the violation, and conducting a public hearing on the matter.

(2) When taking an enforcement action pursuant to this section, the board is vested, in addition to its other powers, with all of the authority to take an action that an enforcement agency may take pursuant to this division.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the board finds that an enforcement agency’s failure to take enforcement action constitutes an imminent threat to public health and safety or to the environment, the board may take the enforcement action that the board determines is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45013.

The board shall make available guidance and assistance to the enforcement agency regarding the inspection, investigation, enforcement, and remediation of illegal, abandoned, inactive, or closed disposal sites to ensure that public health and safety and the environment are protected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45014.

(a) Upon the failure of a person to comply with a final order issued by a local enforcement agency or the board, the Attorney General, upon request of the board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining the person or persons from continuing to violate the order or complaint.

(b) An attorney authorized to act on behalf of the local enforcement agency or the board may petition the superior court for injunctive relief to enforce this part, a term or condition in a solid waste facilities permit, or a standard adopted by the board or the local enforcement agency.

(c) In addition to the administrative imposition of civil penalties pursuant to this part, Article 6 (commencing with Section 42850) of Chapter 16 of Part 3, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 42962) of Chapter 19 of Part 3, an attorney authorized to act on behalf of the local enforcement agency or the board may apply, to the clerk of the appropriate court in the county in which the civil penalty was imposed, for a judgment to collect the penalty. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the decision or order in the civil penalty action, constitutes a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered shall include the amount of the court filing fee that would have been due from an applicant who is not a public agency, and has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered. The amount of the unpaid court filing fee shall be paid to the court prior to satisfying any of the civil penalty amount. Thereafter, any civil penalty or judgment recovered shall be paid, to the maximum extent allowed by law, to the board or to the local enforcement agency, whichever is represented by the attorney who brought the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 29.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

45015.

Remedies under this part are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other applicable remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 34.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45016.

In making a determination regarding the allegations in, and the amount of any liability that may be imposed pursuant to, an order, petition, or complaint and determining the appropriate outcome, and when determining whether to deny, suspend, or revoke a permit or to deny a permit application, the issuing agency, the board, or a court, as the case may be, shall take into consideration:

(a) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of any violation or any condition giving rise to the violation and the various remedies and penalties that are appropriate in the given circumstances, with primary emphasis on protecting the public health and safety and the environment.

(b) Whether the violations or conditions giving rise to the violation have been corrected in a timely fashion or reasonable progress is being made.

(c) Whether the violations or conditions giving rise to the violation demonstrate a chronic pattern of noncompliance with this division, the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, or with the terms and conditions of a solid waste facilities permit, or pose, or have posed, a serious risk to the public health and safety or to the environment.

(d) Whether the violations or conditions giving rise to the violation were intentional.

(e) Whether the violations or conditions giving rise to the violation were voluntarily and promptly reported to appropriate authorities prior to the commencement of an investigation by the enforcement agency.

(f) Whether the violations or conditions giving rise to the violation were due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the violator or were otherwise unavoidable under the circumstances.

(g) Whether in the case of violations of this division, or the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, the violator has established one or more of the following programs prior to committing the violation that will help to prevent violations of the type committed in the future:

(1) A comprehensive compliance program designed to prevent violations of this division, the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, and of the terms and conditions of the solid waste facilities permit.

(2) Employee training programs designed to educate the employees regarding their responsibilities under this division, the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, and the terms and conditions of the solid waste facilities permit.

(3) Regular internal audits to monitor the effectiveness of the comprehensive compliance programs described in paragraph (1).

(4) Confidential systems for employee reporting of potential statutory, regulatory, or solid waste facilities permit violations and for protecting persons so reporting from retaliatory employment actions.

(5) Special incentive programs that promote and reward statutory, regulatory, and permit compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 34.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45017.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), all orders and determinations issued pursuant to this part or Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) shall take effect immediately upon service.

(2) (A) If an order or determination is issued pursuant to this part or Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) to the owner or operator of a solid waste facility operating under a solid waste facilities permit issued in accordance with this part, the owner or operator may petition the executive director of the board, pursuant to this subparagraph, to stay the effect of the order or determination, or portion thereof, pending the completion of administrative appeals before the hearing panel or hearing officer or the board.

(B) A petition submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be in writing and shall state the extraordinary circumstances that justify the stay. The petition shall also state the grounds, if any, on which a finding may be made that the immediate effect of the order or determination will preclude or interfere with the provision of an essential public service so that the public health and safety or the environment will be adversely affected.

(C) If the executive director finds the immediate effect of the order or determination will preclude or interfere with the provision of an essential public service so that the public health and safety or the environment will be adversely affected, the executive director shall consider and act on the petition within three days from the receipt of the petition. The board or the executive director may order the stay to be in effect from the effective date of the order or determination or other appropriate date.

(D) If the executive director does not find that the immediate effect of the order or determination will preclude or interfere with the provision of an essential public service, the board shall act upon the petition within 14 days or at its next scheduled public meeting, whichever date is sooner.

(3) (A) If an order or determination is issued pursuant to this part or Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) to a person that is not the owner or operator of a permitted solid waste facility, the person subject to the order or determination may petition the board pursuant to this subparagraph to stay the effect of the order or determination, or portion thereof, pending the completion of administrative appeals before the hearing panel or hearing officer or the board.

(B) The board shall act on a petition filed pursuant to subparagraph (A) within 14 days or at its next scheduled public meeting whichever date is sooner. The board may order the stay to be in effect from the effective date of the order or determination or other appropriate date.

(b) For purposes of this section, service may be effected by any of the following:

(1) Personal delivery.

(2) First-class United States mail, if it is made by certified mail and evidence of delivery is provided.

(3) Express delivery by a national express mail service that provides evidence of delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45018.

The payment of civil liability assessed in any order issued under this chapter shall be made within 30 days of the date the order becomes final. Any penalties recovered shall be sent to the board or to the enforcement agency, whichever brought the action, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 45014.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 34.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45019.

At least 10 days prior to the date of issuance of an enforcement order which is not for an emergency, or within five days from the date of issuance of an enforcement order for an emergency, or within 15 days from the date of discovery of a violation of a state law, regulation, or term or condition of a solid waste facilities permit for a solid waste facility or disposal site, which is likely to result in an enforcement action, the following agencies shall, to the extent that the enforcement action involves a violation that may also be under the jurisdiction of another state regulatory agency, provide a written statement providing an explanation of, and justification for, the enforcement order or a description of the violation in the following manner:

(a) The enforcement agency, as appropriate, shall provide the statement to the regional water board, the board, the air pollution control district or air quality management district, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(b) A regional water board, as appropriate, shall provide the statement to the enforcement agency, the board, the air pollution control district or air quality management district, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(c) An air pollution control district or an air quality management district, as appropriate, shall provide the statement to the enforcement agency, the board, the regional water board, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(d) The Department of Toxic Substances Control, as appropriate, shall provide the report of inspection required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25185 of the Health and Safety Code to the enforcement agency, the board, the regional water board, and the air pollution control district or air quality management district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45020.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of receipt of a notice of the issuance of, or the proposal to issue, an enforcement order pursuant to Section 45022, the regional water board, the enforcement agency, or the air pollution control district or the air quality management district, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control, as appropriate, shall inspect the solid waste facility or disposal site to determine whether any state law, regulation, or term or condition of a permit, which that board or agency is authorized to enforce, is being violated.

(b) Each agency, to the maximum extent allowed by law, shall do all of the following with respect to enforcement activities at solid waste facilities and disposal sites:

(1) Coordinate enforcement activities to eliminate duplication and facilitate compliance.

(2) Notify the owner and operator of the solid waste facility or owner and operator of the disposal site of a violation before imposing an administrative civil penalty.
